Connecticut, session 2026, HB05353.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
2 "self-directed home care programs" means Medicaid-funded programs
3 that allow a consumer to hire a personal care attendant, (2) "consumer"
4 and "personal care attendants" have the same meanings as provided in
5 section 17b-706 of the general statutes, and (3) "fiscal intermediary"
6 means the organization that contracts with the Department of Social
7 Services to provide payroll, taxes and administrative services for self-
8 directed home care programs.
9 (b) Except for public records exempted from disclosure under section
10 1-210 of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Social Services shall
11 submit quarterly reports with the following information, commencing
12 with information from the quarterly period beginning on April 1, 2024,
13 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
sHB5353 / File No. 387 1

sHB5353 File No. 387
14 to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
15 cognizance of matters relating to human services, labor and government
16 oversight:
17 (1) The most recent completed audited financial statements of the
18 fiscal intermediary;
19 (2) All personal care attendant timesheet reports, including, but not
20 limited to, reports containing the (A) number of weekly consumer-
21 approved timesheets submitted, (B) number submitted on time, (C)
22 number resubmitted after correction, (D) number paid on time, (E)
23 timesheet processing error rate, (F) payroll processing error rate, and (G)
24 number and amount of penalties levied, on a monthly and weekly basis,
25 against the fiscal intermediary for violating provisions of the contract
26 concerning timesheets;
27 (3) All budget, customer service telephone call center and service
28 level agreement reports;
29 (4) The number of and average response time to general customer
30 service requests and the amount and number of penalties levied, on a
31 monthly and weekly basis, against the fiscal intermediary for violations
32 of the contract concerning response time for customer service requests;
33 and
34 (5) The (A) number of telephone calls, voice mail messages, electronic
35 mail and telephonic text messages received from consumers and
36 personal care attendants, (B) number of instances in which such calls or
37 messages were responded to in the contractually required time period
38 and the means of response by the fiscal intermediary, and (C) number
39 and amount of penalties levied against the fiscal intermediary, on a
40 monthly and weekly basis, for violations of the provisions of the
41 contract concerning response time to inquiries from such consumers
42 and personal care attendants.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
sHB5353 / File No. 387 2

sHB5353 File No. 387
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(3), defining "department" was deleted as unnecessary and
a conforming change made to newly designated Subdiv. (3), and in
Subsec. (b)(5)(B), "instances in which such calls or messages were" was
added for clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5353 / File No. 387 3

sHB5353 File No. 387
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost Approximately Approximately
182,000 182,000
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost Approximately Approximately
Benefits1 34,000 34,000
Resources of the General GF - Revenue Approximately Approximately
Fund Gain 58,000 58,000
Department of GF - Potential See Below See Below
Developmental Services Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS) of
approximately $216,000 in both FY 27 and FY 28 and a related federal
grants revenue gain of $58,000 in both years. State costs include $100,000
for fiscal intermediary (FI) contract increases, as well as funding for one
full-time Health Program Associate with an approximate annual salary
of $82,000 (with corresponding fringe of $34,000) to manage the
collection and posting of FI quarterly reports starting from April 1, 2024.
To the extent the Department of Developmental Services (DDS)
assists DSS with the collection of report data, the department may incur
staffing and/or resource costs.
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sHB5353 / File No. 387 4

sHB5353 File No. 387
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sHB5353 / File No. 387 5

sHB5353 File No. 387
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5353
AN ACT REQUIRING DATA TRANSPARENCY FOR SELF-
DIRECTED HOME CARE PROGRAMS.